Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-271
Prompt hearing and disposition; detention review hearing.

(1)(a) A juvenile taken into custody pursuant to sections 43-248, 43-250, and 43-253 shall be brought before the court for adjudication as soon as possible after the petition is filed. On the return of the summons or other process, or mailing of the notice in lieu of summons, or as soon thereafter as legally may be, the court shall proceed to hear and dispose of the case as provided in section 43-279.

(b) The hearing as to a juvenile in custody of the probation officer or the court shall be held as soon as possible but, in all cases, within a six-month period after the petition is filed, and as to a juvenile not in such custody as soon as practicable but, in all cases, within a six-month period after the petition is filed. The computation of the six-month period provided for in this section shall be made as provided in section 29-1207, as applicable.

(2) Any juvenile taken into custody pursuant to sections 43-248, 43-250, and 43-253 may request a detention review hearing. The detention review hearing shall be conducted within forty-eight hours after the request.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 27;

Laws 1982, LB 787, § 11;

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 39.

This section and section 43-278 confer a statutory right to a prompt adjudication hearing to all juveniles within section 43-247(1), (2), (3)(b), and (4). This section and section 43-278 are directory and do not require absolute discharge of a juvenile not adjudicated within the prescribed time period. In re Interest of Brandy M. et al., 250 Neb. 510, 550 N.W.2d 17 (1996).

An appellate court's criminal speedy trial jurisprudence with respect to the calculations of the running of the speedy trial clock is applicable in the juvenile context. In re Interest of Shaquille H., 20 Neb. App. 141, 819 N.W.2d 741 (2012).

Juveniles being held in custody are to receive an adjudication hearing as soon as possible, whereas juveniles not being held in custody are to receive an adjudication hearing as soon as practicable; both sets of juveniles should receive an adjudication hearing within a 6-month period after the petition is filed pursuant to this section, but a statutory scheduling preference is granted to those juveniles that are in custody pending adjudication. In re Interest of Shaquille H., 20 Neb. App. 141, 819 N.W.2d 741 (2012).

This section provides a statutory right to a prompt adjudication hearing for all juveniles, but absolute discharge for the State's failure to comply with the 6-month period is not mandated and is within the discretion of the juvenile court, taking into consideration the best interests of the juvenile, the factors set forth in this section and section 43-278, the right of the juvenile to a prompt and fair adjudication, and the future treatment and rehabilitation of the juvenile in the event of an adjudication. In re Interest of Britny S., 11 Neb. App. 704, 659 N.W.2d 831 (2003).